Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-515
Sale; correction for temperature; sale tickets; contents.

Liquefied petroleum gas sold or delivered to a consumer and measured by the gallon as liquid shall be corrected for temperature in accordance with the volume correction factor table for liquefied petroleum gases, being schedule A of this section. All retail or wholesale sale tickets shall show the metered gallons and the temperature at the time of delivery and the corrected gallonage. This section shall not apply to unit sales or deliveries made direct to mobile fuel tanks, consisting of less than one hundred gallons. To convert from measured volume at another temperature to net volume at 60 degrees Fahrenheit: measure the volume and temperature. Determine the gravity at 60 degrees Fahrenheit. Refer to the column corresponding to this gravity and read the volume conversion factor opposite the observed temperature. Multiply the observed volume by this factor to obtain the volume at 60 degrees Fahrenheit.

Schedule A

VOLUME CORRECTION FACTOR TABLE

Specific Gravity at 60 F/60 F

Degrees Fahr.

Propane

Iso-butane

N-Butane

VOLUME CORRECTION FACTORS.

Laws 1957, c. 240, § 8, p. 803.